incubator/apertium-hi-en-wx/apertium_hn.dix
<pardef n="k/ara__v">
<e><p><l>iyA</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyA</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyA</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyA</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ara</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawIM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawIM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawIM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawIM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aranA</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aranA</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aranA</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aranA</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arane</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arane</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arane</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arane</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aranI</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aranI</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aranI</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aranI</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aranIM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aranIM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aranIM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aranIM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawA</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawA</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawA</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawA</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawe</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawe</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawe</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawe</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawI</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawI</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawI</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arawI</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arake</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arake</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arake</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arake</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arake</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arake</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="kara"><i>k</i><par n="k/ara__v"/></e>
